en: Flours
bg: Брашно
ca: Farines
da: Mel
de: Mehle, Mehl
es: Harinas de origen vegetal, Harinas vegetales, Harinas
fi: jauhot
fr: Farines, Farines végétales
he: קמחים
hr: brašne, brašno
hu: Lisztek
it: Farine, Farina
ja: 穀粉
lt: Miltai
nl: Melen
pl: Mąki, Mąka
pt: Farinha
ru: Мука
tr: Un
zh: 面粉

en: Wheat Daliya
fr: Farines de boulgour

en: Pigeon peas flours, Gandule beans flours
fr: Farines de pois d'Angole, farines de poids cajan

en: Tapioca flours
fr: Farines  de tapioca

en: Bran
de: Kleie
es: Salvado
fi: Leseet
fr: Son
hr: Mekinje
it: Crusca
ja: 糠, ぬか
lt: Sėlenos
nl: Zemelen
pl: Otręby

en: Cereal brans
de: Kleien
es: Salvados de cereales
fi: murot
fr: Sons de céréales
hr: Žitne mekinje
it: Crusche di cereali, crusca di cereali
lt: Dribsnių sėlenos
nl: Graanvruchtenzemelen
pl: Otręby zbożowe

en: Oat brans, Oat bran
es: Salvados de avena
fi: Kauraleseet, Kauralese
fr: Sons d’avoine, Son d'avoine
hr: Zobene mekinje
it: Crusche di avena
lt: Avižų sėlenos
nl: Haverzemelen
pl: Otręby owsiane
pt: Farelo de aveia

en: Rice brans, Rice bran
es: Salvados de arroz
fr: Sons de riz, Son de riz
hr: Rižine mekinje
it: Crusche di riso
ja: 米糠, 米ぬか
lt: Ryžių sėlenos
nl: Rijstzemelen
pl: Otręby ryżowe

en: Rye brans
es: Salvados de centeno
fr: Sons de seigle
hr: Marke raži
it: Crusche di segale
lt: Rugių sėlenos
nl: Roggezemelen
pl: Otręby żytnie

en: Maize bran, Corn bran
fr: Son de maïs
hr: Kukuruzne mekinje
lt: Kukurūzų sėlenos
pl: Otręby kukurydziane

en: Wheat brans, Wheat bran
es: Salvados de trigo
fi: Vehnäleseet, Vehnälese
fr: Sons de blé, Son des blé, Son de blé
hr: Pšenične mekinje
it: Crusche di grano
ja: 小麦ふすま
lt: Kviečių sėlenos
nl: Tarwezemelen
pl: Otręby pszenne
pt: Farelo de trigo

en: Khorasan wheat brans, Kamut brans
es: Salvados de trigo de Jorasán, Salvados de Kamut
fr: Sons de blé khorasan, Sons de Kamut
hr: Khorasan pšenične mekinje
it: Crusche di grano khorasan
nl: Kamutzemelen

en: Spelt brans
de: Dinkelkleien, Dinkelkleie
es: Salvados de espelta
fr: Sons d'épeautre
hr: Mekinje od pira
it: Crusche di farro spelta
lt: Spelta sėlenos
nl: Speltzemelen

en: Instant porridges with milk powder
fr: Porridges instantanés avec du lait en poudre

en: Breakfast cereals
bg: Зърнени закуски
ca: Cereals per esmorzar
cs: Snídaňové cereálie
da: Morgenmadskorn
de: Frühstückscerealien, Frühstückszerealien
es: Cereales para el desayuno, Cereales para desayunar, Cereales desayuno
fi: Aamiaismurot
fr: Céréales pour petit-déjeuner, céréale pour petit-déjeuner, Céréales petit-déjeuner, Céréales type petit déjeuner, Céréales du petit déjeuner
he: דגני בוקר, מדגני בוקר
hr: Žitarice za doručak
hu: Reggeli gabonafélék
it: Cereali da colazione
ja: シリアル食品, 朝食シリアル
lt: Pusryčių dribsniai
nl: Ontbijtgranen
pl: Płatki śniadaniowe
pt: Cereias para pequeno-almoçco
ru: Хлопья к завтраку
sv: Frukostflingor
th: อาหารเช้าธัญพืช
tr: Kahvaltılık gevrek, Kahvaltılık gevrekler
zh: 早餐谷物

en: Extruded cereals
de: Stranggepresstes Getreide
fr: Céréales extrudées
hr: Ekstrudirane žitarice
it: Cereali estrusi
lt: Ekstruduoti javainiai
pl: Zboża ekstrudowane

en: Wheat bran sticks
fr: Bâtonnets de son de blé
hr: Štapići od pšeničnih mekinja
it: Bastoncini di crusca di frumento

en: Chocolate cereal balls
fr: Boules de céréales au chocolat

en: Honey cereal balls, Breakfast cereals puffed corn with honey
fr: Boules de céréales au miel, Boules de maïs soufflées au miel

en: Oat rings, Cheerios
sv: Havreringar